Indiana, session 2026, SB64.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-28-44 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 44. Consumer Call Center Employee Protection
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "employer" means a business
that employs, for the purpose of customer service or back-office
operations, either of the following:
(1) Fifty (50) or more individuals, excluding part-time
employees.
(2) Fifty (50) or more individuals who, in the aggregate, work
at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) hours each week
for the employer, not including overtime hours.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "grant" has the meaning set
forth in IC 5-28-28-2.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "loan" has the meaning set forth
in IC 5-28-28-3.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "part-time employee" means an
2026 IN 64—LS 6202/DI 153


individual employed by an employer for an average of fewer than
twenty (20) hours each week or for fewer than six (6) of the twelve
(12) months before the date on which a determination is made.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "tax credit" has the meaning set
forth in IC 5-28-28-4.
Sec. 6. (a) An employer that intends to relocate either of the
following from Indiana to a foreign country shall notify the
secretary of commerce at least one hundred twenty (120) days
before the relocation:
(1) A call center.
(2) One (1) or more facilities or operating units within a call
center comprising at least thirty percent (30%) of the call
center's total volume when measured against the previous
twelve (12) month average call volume of operations.
(b) If an employer fails to provide the notice under subsection
(a), the employer is ineligible to receive from the state any grant,
loan, or tax credit until seven (7) years after the date on which the
employer relocated the operation or facility described in subsection
(a).
Sec. 7. (a) Beginning July 1, 2026, and every six (6) months
thereafter, the corporation shall compile a list of every employer
that has relocated an operation or facility described in section
6(a)(1) or 6(a)(2) of this chapter.
(b) The corporation shall include on the list the name of the
employer and the date on which the call center or facility was
relocated.
(c) The corporation shall immediately notify each state agency
that is providing the employer with any grant, loan, or tax credit.
(d) The corporation shall include the list in the economic
incentives and compliance report required by IC 5-28-28.
Sec. 8. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), an employer that
appears on a list compiled by the corporation under section 7 of
this chapter is ineligible to receive from the state any grant, loan,
or tax credit until five (5) years after the date on which the
employer relocated the operation or facility described in section
6(a)(1) or 6(a)(2) of this chapter.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), if an employer appears
on a list compiled under section 7 of this chapter, the corporation
shall recapture from the employer an amount equal to the
unamortized value of any grant, loan, or tax credit that the
employer has received from the state after June 30, 2026. The
employer shall pay the recapture amount to the corporation within
2026 IN 64—LS 6202/DI 153


thirty (30) days after receiving the recapture demand.
(c) The corporation may waive the ineligibility to receive from
the state any grant, loan, or tax credit under subsection (a) if the
employer applying for the grant, loan, or tax credit demonstrates
that one (1) or more of the following will occur if the grant, loan,
or tax credit is not provided:
(1) Substantial job loss in Indiana.
(2) Harm to the environment.
(3) A significant economic impact to the state.
Sec. 9. (a) This section applies to contracts entered into or
renewed on or after July 1, 2026.
(b) Each state agency within the executive department of state
government shall ensure that all call center and customer service
work performed for the agency is performed entirely within the
United States.
(c) A contractor that performs call center or customer service
work for the state shall not hire an individual to perform that work
at a location outside the United States.
(d) Beginning July 1, 2028, every individual employed by a
contractor to perform call center or customer service work for the
state shall perform that work within the United States.
Sec. 10. This chapter does not permit withholding or denial of
payments, compensation, or benefits to employees.
2026 IN 64—LS 6202/DI 153